Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-101 Necessity for credit union
charter. Except as expressly permitted by federal law or this chapter, no
person shall engage in the business of a credit union, represent itself as a
credit union, use a name or title containing the phrase "credit
union" or any derivation thereof, or control any other person engaging in
the business of a credit union. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 40, §33]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next